Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2024 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 413.550
to 413.559.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section and section 3 of this 2024 Act:
(a) “Interpreter management system” means an online portal that meets the  require-
ments under subsection (3) of this section.
(b) “Nonprofit entity” means an organization that:
(A) Is registered in this state;
(B) Is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(C) Works with certified and qualified health care interpreters and individuals  from im-
migrant, refugee, low-income and rural communities and representatives of urban and rural
regional councils of government.
(2)(a) For purposes of improving access for Oregon Health Plan members to certified and
qualified health care interpreters, the Oregon Health Authority shall establish and maintain
an interpreter management system that has the  functionality to meet the requirements de-
scribed under subsection (3) of this section.
(b) If a software program is available for purchase that is appropriate for the  interpreter
management system, the authority may contract with the vendor of the software  program
in lieu of creating a new software program.
(3) The interpreter management system shall have the capability to:
(a) Provide an online scheduling mechanism that health care providers,  including coor-
dinated care  organizations, may use to directly schedule appointments with certified and
qualified health care interpreters for purposes of serving Oregon Health Plan members; and
(b) Process billing and payments for health care interpreter services that were  rendered
to Oregon Health Plan members and scheduled through the interpreter management  system.
SECTION 3.
(1)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall enter  into a contract with a
nonprofit entity  to develop and administer a health care interpreter recruitment and re-
tention program. The purpose of the program is to recruit individuals to  become trained as
Enrolled Senate Bill 1578 (SB 1578-B) Page 1
qualified and certified health care  interpreters and to promote retention of certified health
care interpreters within the health care interpreter profession.
(b) The nonprofit entity contracting with  the authority must meet, at a minimum, the
following requirements and standards:
(A) The ability to directly  contact qualified and certified health care interpreters to fill
empty appointment slots  and last-minute cancellations by scheduling appointments through
the interpreter management system described under section 2 of this 2024 Act, or otherwise.
(B) Providing information, in consultation with the Oregon Health Authority, to  health
care interpreters regarding the health  care interpreter qualification and certification stand-
ards established by the authority.
(C) Informing  health care interpreters of training and professional development oppor-
tunities, made available through the nonprofit entity or otherwise, that are in accordance
with standards adopted by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 413.558.
(2) A nonprofit entity that contracts and consults with the  Oregon Health Authority
under subsection (1) of this section shall report annually to the authority on the:
(a) Amount of moneys received from the authority that were applied toward  providing
training and recruitment of health care interpreters, if any;
(b) Health care interpreter training provided by the nonprofit entity, if any;
(c) Outreach and recruitment efforts directed toward certified and qualified  health care
interpreters that the nonprofit entity has provided or plans to provide; and
(d) The fill  rates of appointments scheduled through the interpreter management system
described under section 2 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 4.
Not later than January 1, 2025, the  Oregon Health Authority shall take all
steps necessary to secure federal financial participation in  the costs of directly reimbursing
health care interpreters for health care interpretation services provided to Oregon Health
Plan members.
SECTION 5.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (1), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Health Systems Division -Administration, is increased
by $280,274, for carrying out the provisions of sections 2, 3 and 4 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 5 (1), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health  Authority, for Health Services Division - Administration, is
increased by $280,274, for carrying out the provisions of sections 2, 3 and 4 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (6), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30,  2025, for central services, is increased by $260,000, for carrying
out the provisions of sections 2, 3 and 4 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 5 (6), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for central services, is increased by $240,000, for
carrying out the provisions of sections 2, 3 and 4 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 9.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (7), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is in-
creased by $6,856, for carrying out the provisions of sections 2, 3 and 4 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 5 (7), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
Enrolled Senate Bill 1578 (SB 1578-B) Page 2
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for state assessments  and enterprise-wide costs,
is increased by $6,856, for carrying out the provisions of sections 2, 3 and 4 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (10), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for  shared administrative services, is
increased by $302,148, for carrying out the provisions of sections 2, 3 and 4 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 12. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1578 (SB 1578-B) Page 3